apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="beg/et__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>et</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>et</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ets</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ot</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>otten</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etting</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etting</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etting</l> 
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/in__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>in</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>in</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ins</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>un</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inning</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inning</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inning</l> 
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/old__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>old</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>old</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>olds</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eld</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eld</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>olding</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>olding</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>olding</l> 
        <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ben/d__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ds</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ding</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ding</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ding</l> 
        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cut__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ide__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ide</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ide</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ides</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ode</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>idden</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ake</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ake</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akes</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ook</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aken</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ind</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ind</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inds</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ound</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ound</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inding</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inding</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inding</l> 
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="bind">
        <i>b</i> 
        <par n="f/ind__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="begin">
        <i>beg</i> 
        <par n="beg/in__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="behold">
	    <i>beh</i> 
	    <par n="h/old__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bend">
        <i>ben</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bet">
        <i>bet</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="build">
        <i>buil</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="cut">
        <i>cut</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="find out">
        <i>f</i> 
        <par n="f/ind__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>out</l> 
        <r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="find">
        <i>f</i> 
        <par n="f/ind__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="hold">
        <i>h</i> 
        <par n="h/old__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="hit">
        <i>hit</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lend">
        <i>len</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="let">
        <i>let</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="put">
        <i>put</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="put out">
	    <i>put</i> 
            <par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>out</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="send back">
        <i>sen</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>back</l> 
        <r><g><b/>back</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="send in">
        <i>sen</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>in</l> 
        <r><g><b/>in</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="send">
        <i>sen</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="set">
        <i>set</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="set up">
        <i>set</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="shake">
        <i>sh</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shut">
        <i>shut</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shut down">
        <i>shut</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>down</l> 
        <r><g><b/>down</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="spend">
        <i>spen</i> 
        <par n="ben/d__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="split">
        <i>split</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="take off">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>off</l> 
        <r><g><b/>off</g></r> 
      </p>
</e>
<e lm="take a look">
	<i>t</i> 
	<par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
	<p>
		<l><b/>a<b/>look</l> 
		<r><g><b/>a<b/>look</g></r> 
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="take out">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>out</l> 
        <r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take care">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>care</l> 
        <r><g><b/>care</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take part">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>part</l> 
        <r><g><b/>part</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take place">
	    <i>t</i>
	    <par n="t/ake__vblex"/>
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>place</l>
		    <r><g><b/>place</g></r>
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take advantage of">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l> 
        <r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="take away">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>away</l> 
        <r><g><b/>away</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="undertake">
        <i>undert</i> 
        <par n="t/ake__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="upset">
        <i>upset</i> 
        <par n="cut__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="ride">
        <i>r</i> 
        <par n="r/ide__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="rebuild"><i>rebuil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
